North Carolina, session 2025, HB630.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Subdivision (2b) of subsection (c) of G.S. 105-164.14 is reenacted as
it existed immediately before its repeal.
SECTION 2. Subdivision (2c) of subsection (c) of G.S. 105-164.14 is reenacted as
it existed immediately before its repeal.
SECTION 3. G.S. 105-467(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Exemptions and Refunds. – The State exemptions and exclusions contained in Article
5 of Subchapter I of this Chapter, except for the exemption for food in G.S. 105-164.13B, apply
to the local sales and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under this Article. The State
refund provisions contained in G.S. 105-164.14 and G.S. 105-164.14A apply to the local sales
and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under this Article. A refund of an excessive or
erroneous State sales tax collection allowed under G.S. 105-164.11 and a refund of State sales
tax paid on a rescinded sale or cancelled service contract under G.S. 105-164.11A apply to the
local sales and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under this Article. The aggregate
annual local refund amount allowed an entity under G.S. 105-164.14(b) for the State's fiscal year
may not exceed thirteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($13,300,000). A
Except as provided in this subsection, a taxing county may not allow an exemption, exclusion,
or refund that is not allowed under the State sales and use tax. A local school administrative unit
and a joint agency created by interlocal agreement among local school administrative units
pursuant to G.S. 160A-462 to jointly purchase food service-related materials, supplies, and
equipment on their behalf is allowed an annual refund of sales and use taxes paid by it under this
Article on direct purchases of tangible personal property and services. Sales and use tax liability
indirectly incurred by the entity as part of a real property contract for real property that is owned
or leased by the entity and is a capital improvement for use by the entity is considered a sales or
use tax liability incurred on direct purchases by the entity for the purpose of this subsection. The
refund allowed under this subsection does not apply to purchases of electricity,
telecommunications service, ancillary service, piped natural gas, video programming, or a
prepaid meal plan. A request for a refund is due in the same time and manner as provided in
G.S. 105-164.14(c). Refunds applied for more than three years after the due date are barred."
SECTION 4. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 105-164.44H is repealed, and the Director
of the Budget shall adjust the budget of the State Public School Fund accordingly.
*H630-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Public School
Fund a recurring amount equal to the amount of the adjustment in Section 4 of this act.
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2025,
and applies to sales made on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 630-First Edition